Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4511.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
BJH H02045'25 (H-1) fbudyn


Sec. 1. (1) Subject to provisions in the Michigan penal code,
1931 PA 328, MCL 750.1 to 750.568, this state or any political
subdivision of this state shall not do any of the following with
regard to digital assets:
(a) Ban the holding of digital assets.
(b) Require a person to be granted a permit or license for the
holding of digital assets, unless the person is holding the digital
assets on behalf of another person.
(c) Impose any other impairment for the holding of digital
assets.
(d) Impose any additional tax, withholding, assessment, or
charge that is based solely on the use of the digital asset as the
method of payment. This subdivision does not prohibit this state
from imposing a tax, withholding, assessment, or charge that would
otherwise be imposed if the transaction had taken place with United
States legal tender.
(2) An agency or department of this state shall not advocate
for or support, including by issuing a memorandum or official
statement of support from the agency or department or its
designees, the testing, adoption, or implementation of a central
bank digital currency by the United States government.
(3) Subject to provisions in the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA
328, MCL 750.1 to 750.568, this state or any political subdivision
of this state shall not prohibit any of the following:
(a) The operation of a node for the purpose of connecting to a
blockchain protocol or a protocol built on top of a blockchain
protocol.
(b) The transfer of digital assets on a blockchain protocol.
(c) The participation in staking on a blockchain protocol.
BJH H02045'25 (H-1) fbudyn


(4) A person that validates only a transaction for digital
asset mining, the operation of a node or series of nodes on a
blockchain network, or the provision of digital asset mining or
staking services for persons is not civilly liable.
(5) As used in this section:
(a) "Blockchain" means data that is shared across a network to
create a ledger of verified transactions or information among
network participants linked using cryptography to maintain the
integrity of the ledger and to execute other functions, and
distributed among network participants in an automated fashion to
concurrently update network participants on the state of the ledger
and any other functions.
(b) "Blockchain protocol" means any executable software
deployed to a blockchain composed of source code that is publicly
available and accessible, including a smart contract or any network
of smart contracts.
(c) "Consensus mechanism" means a protocol or set of protocols
that bring all nodes of a blockchain network into agreement to
verify the state of a digital ledger.
(d) "Digital asset" means virtual currency, cryptocurrencies,
and stablecoins.
(e) "Digital asset mining" means using electricity to power a
computer or node for the purpose of securing a blockchain network.
(f) "Holding" means possession, including, but not limited to,
electronic possession.
(g) "Node" means a computational device that contains and
updates a copy of a blockchain.
(h) "Smart contract" means a self-executing contract or
agreement that is stored on a blockchain network that executes
BJH H02045'25 (H-1) fbudyn


automatically when the contract's conditions are met.
(i) "Staking" means using a node to lock digital assets in
order to operate the consensus mechanism of a blockchain protocol.
Final Page
BJH H02045'25 (H-1) fbudyn